Utah statutes.
77-27-21.7.   Sex offender restrictions.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Protected area" means the premises occupied by:
(i)  any licensed day care or preschool facility;
(ii)  a swimming pool that is open to the public;
(iii)  a public or private primary or secondary school that is not on the
grounds of a correctional facility;
(iv)  a community park that is open to the public; and
(v)  a playground that is open to the public, including those areas designed
to provide children space, recreational equipment, or other amenities intended
to allow children to engage in physical activity.
(b) (i)  Except under Subsection (1)(b)(ii), "protected area" also includes
any area that is 1,000 feet or less from the residence of a victim of the sex
offender's offense under Subsection (1)(c) if:
(A)  the sex offender is on probation or parole for an offense under
Subsection (1)(c);
(B)  the victim or the victim's parent or guardian has advised the Department
of Corrections that the victim desires that the sex offender be restricted
from the area under this Subsection (1)(b)(i) and authorizes the Department of
Corrections to advise the sex offender of the area where the victim resides
for purposes of this Subsection (1)(b); and
(C)  the Department of Corrections has notified the sex offender in writing
that the sex offender is prohibited from being in the protected area under
Subsection (1)(b)(i) and has also provided a description of the location of
the protected area to the sex offender.
(ii)  "Protected area" under Subsection (1)(b)(i) does not apply to the
residence and area surrounding the residence of a victim if:
(A)  the victim is a member of the immediate family of the sex offender; and
(B)  the terms of the sex offender's agreement of probation or parole allow
the sex offender to reside in the same residence as the victim.
(c)  "Sex offender" means an adult or juvenile who is required to register
under Section 77-27-21.5 due to a conviction for any offense that is committed
against a person younger than 18 years of age.
(2)  It is a class A misdemeanor for any sex offender to be in any protected
area on foot or in or on any vehicle, including vehicles that are not
motorized, except for:
(a)  those specific periods of time when the sex offender must be present
within a protected area in order to carry out necessary parental
responsibilities;
(b)  when the protected area is a school building:
(i)  under Subsection (1)(a)(iii);
(ii)  being opened for or being used for a public activity; and
(iii)  not being used for any school-related function that involves persons
younger than 18 years of age; or
(c)  when the protected area is a licensed day care or preschool facility:
(i)  under Subsection (1)(a)(i); and
(ii)  located within a building that is open to the public for purposes,
services, or functions that are operated separately from the day care or
preschool facility located in the building, except that the sex offender may
not be in any part of the building occupied by the day care or preschool
facility.
